Hawaii statutes.
§241-4.6 Renewable energy technologies;
income tax credit. The renewable energy technologies income tax credit
provided under section 235-12.5 shall be operative for this chapter for taxable
years beginning after December 31, 2002; provided that the system was installed
after June 30, 2003. [L 1991, c 99, §2; am L 2004, c 97, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next